Missouri, session 2026, SB862.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.050, 313.820, 572.010, 572.020,
572.070, and 572.100, RSMo, are repealed and twenty-three new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
27.180, 43.050, 313.425, 313.427, 313.429, 313.431, 313.433,
313.435, 313.437, 313.438, 313.439, 313.440, 313.441, 313.442,
313.443, 313.444, 313.445, 313.820, 572.010, 572.020, 572.070,
572.100, and 650.930, to read as follows:
27.180. There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Illegal Gaming Enforcement Fund", which shall consist
of moneys received by the state treasury pursuant to
subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of section 313.429 or other
funds so appropriated. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
Moneys in the fund shall be used by the attorney general,
prosecutors, and law enforcement to investigate, enforce,
charge, and prosecute violations of chapter 572.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 862 2
revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
43.050. 1. The superintendent may appoint not more
than thirty-four captains and one director of radio, each of
whom shall have the same qualifications as the
superintendent, nor more than sixty-eight lieutenants, and
such additional force of sergeants, corporals and patrolmen,
so that the total number of members of the patrol shall not
exceed one thousand sixty-four officers and patrolmen and
such numbers of radio personnel as the superintendent deems
necessary.
2. In case of a national emergency the superintendent
may name additional patrolmen and radio personnel in a
number sufficient to replace, temporarily, patrolmen and
radio personnel called into military services.
3. The superintendent may enter into an agreement with
the Missouri gaming commission to enforce any law, rule, or
regulation, conduct background investigations under the laws
of this state, and enforce the regulations of licensed
gaming activities governed by chapter 313. A notice of
either party to terminate or modify the provisions of such
agreement shall be in writing and executed not less than one
year from the effective date of the termination or
modification, unless mutually agreed upon by the
superintendent and the Missouri gaming commission. Members
of the patrol hired in conjunction with any agreement with
the Missouri gaming commission shall not be subject to the
personnel cap referenced in subsection 1 of this section.
If such agreement is subsequently terminated or modified to
reduce the number of personnel used in such agreement, those

SB 862 3
members affected by such termination or modification shall
not be subject to the personnel cap referenced in subsection
1 of this section for a period of five years.
4. The superintendent may enter into an agreement with
the Missouri lottery commission to enforce any law, rule, or
regulation, conduct background investigations under the laws
of this state, and enforce the regulations of licensed
lottery activities governed by chapter 313. A notice of
either party to terminate or modify the provisions of such
agreement shall be in writing and executed not less than one
year from the effective date of the termination or
modification, unless mutually agreed upon by the
superintendent and the Missouri lottery commission. Members
of the patrol hired in conjunction with any agreement with
the Missouri lottery commission shall not be subject to the
personnel cap referenced in subsection 1 of this section.
If such agreement is subsequently terminated or modified to
reduce the number of personnel used in such agreement, those
members affected by such termination or modification shall
not be subject to the personnel cap referenced in subsection
1 of this section for a period of five years.
5. Member positions of the patrol originally acquired
in conjunction with the community-oriented policing services
federal grant or members assigned to fulfill the duties
established in sections 43.350 to 43.380 shall not be
subject to the personnel cap referenced in subsection 1 of
this section.
[5.] 6. Applicants shall not be discriminated against
because of race, creed, color, national origin or sex.
313.425. Sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Missouri Video Lottery Regulatory
Act" and shall provide additional funding for Missouri

SB 862 4
education programs and additional resources for Missouri
municipalities and counties by establishing a licensing and
regulatory framework for a system of video lottery game
terminals to conduct video lottery games.
313.427. As used in sections 313.425 to 313.445, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adjusted gross gaming revenue", the amount of
revenue generated by a video lottery game terminal that is
remaining after:
(a) Payment of winnings to players; and
(b) Deduction by the commission of that amount
necessary to pay direct administrative costs for the
operation of the central control system, but before
deduction of the adjusted gross gaming revenue tax;
(2) "Adjusted gross gaming revenue tax", a tax of
thirty-one percent imposed on adjusted gross gaming revenue;
(3) "Central control system", a computer system
developed or procured by the commission that connects all
video lottery game terminals, redemption terminals, and
other necessary equipment using standard industry protocols
capable of monitoring activity on a video lottery game
terminal, redemption terminal, and other necessary
equipment, and that can activate or deactivate a video
lottery gaming terminal;
(4) "Commission" or "lottery commission", the state
lottery commission appointed by the governor to manage and
oversee the lottery under section 313.215;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
(6) "Municipality and county administration tax", a
tax of three percent imposed on adjusted gross gaming
revenue;

SB 862 5
(7) "Net terminal income", the amount of adjusted
gross gaming revenue remaining after deduction of the gross
gaming revenue tax and municipality and county
administration tax, which shall be divided equally between
the video lottery game operator and the video lottery game
retailer;
(8) "Person", an individual, partnership, corporation,
or limited liability company;
(9) "Use agreement", a contract executed by and
between a video lottery game operator and a video lottery
game retailer, approved by the commission containing minimum
terms and conditions determined by the commission
establishing the right of the video lottery game operator to
place and operate video lottery game terminals on the
premises of a video lottery game retailer;
(10) "Video lottery game", any game approved by the
commission for play on a video lottery game terminal;
(11) "Video lottery game distributor", a person
licensed by the commission who distributes video lottery
games, video lottery game terminals, redemption terminals,
ancillary equipment, or parts and components for video
lottery gaming terminals approved by the commission for sale
to video lottery game distributors or video lottery game
operators;
(12) "Video lottery game handler", a person licensed
by the commission and employed by a video lottery game
operator to handle, place, operate, and service video
lottery game terminals, redemption terminals, and ancillary
equipment;
(13) "Video lottery game manufacturer", a person
licensed by the commission who manufactures video lottery
games, video lottery game terminals, redemption terminals,

SB 862 6
ancillary equipment, or parts and components for video
lottery game terminals or video lottery games approved by
the commission for sale to video lottery game operators;
(14) "Video lottery game operator", a person licensed
by the commission who owns, rents, or leases video lottery
games and video lottery game terminals for placement and
operation at the business premises of a licensed video
lottery game retailer;
(15) "Video lottery game redemption terminal" or
"redemption terminal", the collective hardware, software,
and other ancillary equipment approved by the commission
used to redeem a video lottery game ticket for cash;
(16) "Video lottery game retailer", a person licensed
by the commission to enter into use agreements with video
lottery game operators for the placement of video lottery
game terminals at the business premises of the licensed
video lottery game retailer who meets the requirements of a
lottery game retailer under section 313.260. No person with
a primary purpose of providing entertainment, activities, or
educational services to anyone under the age of twenty-one
shall be licensed as a video lottery game retailer;
(17) "Video lottery game terminal", any device that,
through an electronic, mechanical, or electromechanical
process, including through the use of any application,
software, or other system that accepts legal tender, credits
or tickets, or forms of digital currency to play, and
through which is used to generate a prize of money or form
of credit that can be redeemed for money or another form of
monetary payment that is presented to the player by a set or
combination of alphanumeric symbols or lines of symbols that
determine the amount of the prize, regardless of the
operating system that determined the prize. Electronic

SB 862 7
gaming machines, with the exception of those operated under
section 313.800, shall be regulated by the commission. All
other forms of electronic gaming machines that are not
regulated by the commission or bear the commission's seal
are not legal under the definition of a slot machine in
section 572.010;
(18) "Video lottery game terminal credit", credits
either purchased or won on a video lottery game terminal
100 that may be used to play video lottery games or be converted
101 into a video lottery game ticket;
102 (19) "Video lottery game ticket", a document printed
103 or provided electronically by a video lottery game terminal
104 at the conclusion of any video lottery game play or series
105 of plays that may be redeemed for cash at a redemption
106 terminal located on the premises of the video lottery game
107 retailer, or that may be reinserted into a video lottery
108 game terminal for video lottery game play on the premises of
109 the video lottery game retailer where such ticket was issued.
313.429. 1. (1) The commission shall implement a
system of video lottery game terminals and issue licenses to
video lottery game manufacturers, video lottery game
distributors, video lottery game operators, video lottery
game handlers, and video lottery game retailers; provided,
however, that:
(a) No person licensed as a video lottery game
manufacturer or a video lottery game distributor shall be
issued a license as a video lottery game operator or video
lottery game retailer;
(b) No person licensed as a video lottery game
operator shall be issued a license as a video lottery game
manufacturer, video lottery game distributor, or video
lottery game retailer;

SB 862 8
(c) No person licensed as a video lottery game
retailer shall be issued a license as a video lottery game
manufacturer, video lottery game distributor, or video
lottery game operator.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a video
lottery game manufacturer or a video lottery gaming
distributor from being licensed as both a video lottery game
manufacturer and a video lottery game distributor. Nothing
in this subsection shall prevent a video lottery game
manufacturer or a video lottery game distributor from
contracting with the commission to provide or operate the
central control system.
(3) The commission shall not authorize or allow a
single video lottery game manufacturer or video lottery game
distributor as the sole or exclusive manufacturer or
distributor of video lottery game terminals, video lottery
games, or redemption terminals in Missouri.
(4) The commission shall ensure that the video lottery
game system authorized by sections 313.425 to 313.437 shall
allow for multiple video lottery game manufacturers, video
lottery game distributors, video lottery game operators, and
video lottery game retailers to encourage private sector
investment and job opportunities for Missouri citizens.
2. Video lottery game terminals and video lottery
games shall meet independent testing standards approved by
the commission, as tested by one or more licensed
independent test labs. The commission shall promulgate
rules for minimum standards for video lottery game
terminals, video lottery games, and redemption terminals.
Such minimum standards shall include:

SB 862 9
(1) Video lottery game terminals shall conform to all
requirements of federal law and regulations, including FCC
Class A Emission Standards;
(2) Video lottery game terminals and video lottery
games shall theoretically pay out a mathematically
demonstrable percentage during the expected lifetime of the
terminal of all amounts played, which shall not be less than
eighty percent. The commission shall establish a maximum
payout percentage for approved models by rule. Video
lottery game terminals that may be affected by skill shall
meet this standard when using a method of play that will
provide the greatest return to the player over a period of
continuous play;
(3) Video lottery game terminals shall use a random
number generator computer, software, or similar random
selection process to generate and produce an independent and
random outcome of each play of a video lottery game. The
random selection process shall meet ninety-nine percent
confidence limits using a standard chi-squared test for
goodness of fit;
(4) Video lottery game terminals shall display an
accurate representation of the video lottery game outcome;
(5) Video lottery game terminals shall not
automatically alter pay tables or any function of the video
lottery game terminal based on internal computation of hold
percentage or have any means of manipulation that affects
the random selection process or probabilities of winning a
game;
(6) Video lottery game terminals shall not be
adversely affected by static discharge or other
electromagnetic interference;

SB 862 10
(7) Video lottery game terminals shall, while in an
idle state or on demand, be capable of detecting and
displaying "power reset", "door open", and "door just
closed";
(8) Video lottery game terminals shall have the
capacity to display complete play history including, but not
limited to, outcome, intermediate play steps, credits
available, bets placed, credits paid, and credits cashed
out, for the most recent game played and ten games played
immediately prior thereto;
(9) The theoretical payback percentage of a video
lottery game terminal shall not be capable of being changed
without making a hardware or software change in the video
lottery game terminal, either on site or through the central
control system;
(10) Video lottery game terminals shall be designed so
that replacement of parts or modules required for normal
maintenance does not necessitate replacement of the
electromechanical meters;
(11) Video lottery game terminals shall have one or
more mechanisms that accept cash in the form of bills and
accepting tickets. The mechanisms shall be designed to
prevent obtaining credits without paying by stringing,
slamming, drilling, or other means. If such attempts at
100 physical tampering are made, the video lottery game terminal
101 shall suspend itself from operating until reset;
102 (12) Video lottery game terminals shall have
103 accounting software that keeps an electronic record of
104 information including, but not limited to, total cash
105 inserted, value of winning tickets claimed by players, total
106 credits played, total credits awarded by a video lottery

SB 862 11
107 game terminal, and payback percentage credited to players of
108 each video lottery game;
109 (13) Video lottery game terminals shall be capable of
110 issuing and accepting tickets for play, commonly known as
111 "ticket-in ticket-out". Video lottery game terminals shall
112 not directly dispense anything of value except for tickets
113 representing credits purchased or won on a video lottery
114 game terminal. The ticket shall indicate the total amount
115 of award, the time of day in a twenty-four-hour format
116 showing hours and minutes, the date, the video lottery game
117 terminal serial number, the sequential number of the ticket,
118 and an encrypted validation number from which the validity
119 of the prize may be determined;
120 (14) Video lottery game terminals and redemption
121 terminals shall be connected to the central control system
122 approved by the commission. The commission shall provide
123 licensed video lottery game operators with the necessary
124 protocols to connect video lottery game terminals to the
125 central control system after such video lottery game
126 terminals have been approved by the commission. No video
127 lottery game terminal shall be placed in operation without
128 first connecting to the central control system and shall
129 remain connected to the central control system at all times
130 a video lottery game terminal is made available for play; and
131 (15) The commission shall adopt rules to identify the
132 location, by municipality and county, of each video lottery
133 game terminal being operated in the state and connected to
134 the central control system. The commission shall adopt
135 rules to maintain a current list of such information, and
136 shall provide said list to the department of revenue to
137 ensure accurate taxation and reporting.

SB 862 12
138 3. (1) The commission shall impose an initial
139 nonrefundable administrative license application fee that
140 shall be submitted when the application is filed and
141 deposited in the state lottery fund as follows:
142 (a) For video lottery game manufacturers and video
143 lottery game distributors, twenty-five thousand dollars;
144 (b) For video lottery game operators, one hundred
145 thousand dollars;
146 (c) For video lottery game retailer establishments,
147 one thousand dollars for each video lottery game retailer
148 establishment; and
149 (d) For video lottery game handlers, one hundred
150 dollars.
151 (2) The initial license shall be for a period of one
152 year. Thereafter, renewals of such license shall be for a
153 period of four years. Subsequent to the initial one-year
154 period, anyone licensed pursuant to this subsection shall
155 submit an annual nonrefundable fee to be deposited in the
156 state lottery fund. Such fee shall be paid as follows:
157 (a) Five thousand dollars for video lottery game
158 manufacturers and video lottery game distributors;
159 (b) Fifty thousand dollars for video lottery game
160 operators;
161 (c) One hundred dollars for video lottery game
162 handlers; and
163 (d) One thousand dollars for each establishment owned
164 and operated by a video lottery game retailer.
165 (3) In addition to any other fees imposed by sections
166 313.425 to 313.445, an annual nonrefundable administrative
167 fee of one thousand dollars shall be paid to the department
168 for each video lottery game terminal placed in service, and
169 shall be deemed an administrative fee on the device itself

SB 862 13
170 and not on the operation or play thereof. Such annual
171 administrative fee shall be equally divided and paid by the
172 video lottery game operator and the video lottery game
173 retailer to the department once per year. The department
174 shall remit two hundred dollars of the fee to the
175 commission, which shall deposit such fee in the state
176 lottery fund. The remaining eight hundred dollars of such
177 fee shall be remitted to the illegal gaming enforcement
178 fund, which the state treasurer shall pay as follows:
179 (a) One hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the
180 Missouri state highway patrol for use in investigations and
181 enforcement of sections 313.425 to 313.445;
182 (b) Fifty dollars shall be transmitted to the Missouri
183 attorney general's office for use in illegal gambling
184 enforcement;
185 (c) Fifty dollars shall be transmitted to the Missouri
186 prosecutors pension fund;
187 (d) Four hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the
188 Missouri veterans commission; and
189 (e) Two hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the
190 municipality in which the video lottery game terminal is
191 located, except that if a video lottery game terminal is
192 located in an unincorporated area of a county, the two
193 hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the county in which
194 the video lottery game terminal is located.
195 (4) No license shall be issued to any person who has
196 been convicted of a felony or any crime involving illegal
197 gambling.
198 (5) A licensee shall notify the commission of any
199 change relating to the status of its license or any other
200 information contained in the application materials on file
201 with the commission.

SB 862 14
202 4. Licensed video lottery game operators and licensed
203 video lottery game retailers shall enter into a use
204 agreement for the placement of video lottery game
205 terminals. The video lottery game operator shall provide a
206 true and accurate copy of the executed use agreement to the
207 video lottery game retailer within ten days after execution
208 of the use agreement by the parties. The use agreement
209 shall be on a form approved by the commission. The use
210 agreement shall contain commercially reasonable terms
211 including, but not limited to, the following minimum
212 requirements:
213 (1) An equal division of net terminal income between a
214 video lottery game operator and video lottery game retailer;
215 (2) A requirement that the video lottery game operator
216 is to be responsible for collection, remittance, and
217 disbursement of gross gaming revenue, gross gaming revenue
218 tax, and net terminal income;
219 (3) An affirmative statement that no inducement was
220 offered, proposed, or accepted by either the video lottery
221 game operator or the video lottery game retailer regarding
222 the placement or operation of video lottery game terminals
223 at the premises of the video lottery game retailer;
224 (4) An indemnity and hold harmless provision on behalf
225 of the state, the commission, and its agents relative to any
226 cause of action arising out of the use agreement between a
227 video lottery game operator and a video lottery game
228 retailer;
229 (5) A prohibition on the assignment of the agreement
230 from or to any person except from a video lottery game
231 operator to another video lottery game operator or from a
232 video lottery game retailer to another video lottery game

SB 862 15
233 retailer, and providing that all use agreements shall be
234 otherwise freely assignable;
235 (6) A release of the video lottery game retailer from
236 any continuing contractual obligation to the video lottery
237 game operator if the video lottery game operator has its
238 license revoked or denied, has its renewal denied, or
239 surrenders its license;
240 (7) A provision that the parties agree to modify the
241 agreement to the extent necessary to comply with a change in
242 Missouri law or commission rules;
243 (8) A term not to exceed five years and shall not
244 contain any automatic renewal or extension of any such term;
245 and
246 (9) Provisions approved by the commission.
247 5. No video lottery game retailer shall enter into a
248 use agreement with more than one video lottery game operator
249 at any time. Only upon termination of a use agreement with
250 a video lottery game operator may a video lottery game
251 retailer enter into a new use agreement with a different
252 video lottery game operator.
253 6. All licensees shall remain subject to all income
254 taxes, sales taxes, and use taxes lawfully assessed by this
255 state, or any municipality, county, or other political
256 subdivision of this state; provided, however, that a
257 municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this
258 state shall not impose, levy, collect, or assess any license
259 requirement, tax, or fee including, but not limited to, any
260 permit tax or fee, sticker fee, occupation tax or fee,
261 amusement tax or fee, or taxes or fees upon the play, use,
262 ownership, lease, placement, operation, repair, service,
263 transportation, or storage of any video lottery game
264 terminal, video lottery game, video lottery game

SB 862 16
265 manufacturer, video lottery game distributor, video lottery
266 game operator, or video lottery game retailer.
267 7. (1) Video lottery game terminals shall be
268 inspected and approved by the commission prior to being
269 sold, leased, or transferred.
270 (2) Video lottery game manufacturers and video lottery
271 game distributors may buy, sell, or lease new or refurbished
272 video lottery game terminals to and from video lottery game
273 manufacturers, video lottery game distributors, and video
274 lottery game operators.
275 (3) Redemption terminals shall meet independent
276 testing standards approved by the commission. The
277 commission may approve redemption terminals that have been
278 approved by another state for operation for use as part of
279 that state's video lottery game system or similar system.
280 8. (1) Licensed video lottery game operators:
281 (a) May buy, lease, or rent video lottery game
282 terminals from licensed video lottery game manufacturers or
283 distributors;
284 (b) May handle, place, service, and maintain video
285 lottery game terminals; and
286 (c) Shall connect all video lottery game terminals to
287 the central control system approved by the commission.
288 (2) All video lottery game tickets shall be redeemed
289 using a redemption terminal. Such redemption terminal shall
290 be located within a video lottery game retailer's
291 establishment in direct proximity to such video lottery game
292 terminals. Video lottery game operators shall pay the
293 commission thirty-two percent of any unclaimed cash prize
294 associated with each video lottery game ticket that has not
295 been redeemed within one hundred eighty days of issuance.

SB 862 17
296 (3) A video lottery game operator shall not, directly
297 or indirectly, lease real estate to a video lottery game
298 retailer. No lease of real property to a video lottery game
299 retailer may contain a provision requiring any sharing or
300 splitting of net terminal income between the lessor and the
301 lessee, or any method of rent calculation using a percentage
302 of net terminal income, or any other similar provision or
303 method for the determination or calculation of any rent,
304 concession, or other charge by a lessor to a lessee. Video
305 lottery game retailers shall submit true, accurate, and
306 complete leases or similar agreements regarding the premises
307 of the video lottery game retailer to the commission with
308 their license application and annual license renewal
309 application.
310 (4) Only a video lottery game operator or an
311 operator's employee may negotiate and enter into a use
312 agreement with a video lottery game retailer for the initial
313 or continued placement of video lottery game terminals.
314 Video lottery game operators and video lottery game
315 retailers shall not offer, propose, or accept anything of
316 value, other than the equal division of net terminal income
317 in exchange for the execution of a use agreement. No video
318 lottery game operator or video lottery game retailer shall
319 pay compensation or any other valuable consideration to any
320 third party for the solicitation, procurement, execution, or
321 delivery of any use agreement with a video lottery game
322 operator or video lottery game retailer, except as approved
323 by the commission. A video lottery game operator shall not
324 share or split net terminal income with any other video
325 lottery game operator licensee under sections 313.425 to
326 313.445 or with any other third-party, except as approved by
327 the commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the

SB 862 18
328 sharing or splitting of net terminal income by a video
329 lottery game operator.
330 (5) Any agreement, contract, or arrangement for the
331 initial or continued placement of video lottery game
332 terminals entered into by any person prior to being duly
333 licensed as a video lottery game operator or a video lottery
334 game retailer by the commission shall be invalid. Only use
335 agreements by and between licensed video lottery game
336 operators and licensed video lottery game retailers shall be
337 deemed valid for the placement and operation of video
338 lottery game terminals.
339 9. (1) To combat problem gambling, video lottery game
340 operators shall allow players to be self-excluded from video
341 lottery game play pursuant to rules adopted by the
342 commission.
343 (2) Video lottery game operators may establish a
344 player rewards systems approved by the commission. No
345 player shall be required to enroll in a rewards program
346 offered by a video lottery game operator as a condition to
347 play video lottery games.
348 10. (1) Video lottery game terminals shall not
349 directly dispense anything of value except for video lottery
350 game tickets. Tickets shall be dispensed by pressing the
351 ticket dispensing button on the video lottery game terminal
352 at the end of any video lottery game play or series of
353 plays. The value of video lottery game terminal credits
354 shall be determined by the commission. Video lottery game
355 operators shall not be required to pay out coins for prizes
356 to be paid to a player having a value less than one dollar,
357 and redemption terminals shall not be required to dispense
358 coins. Any prize to be paid to a player having a value less
359 than one dollar shall be dispensed to the player from the

SB 862 19
360 redemption terminal in the form of a ticket, which may be
361 inserted into a video lottery game terminal for play. The
362 commission may adopt rules allowing redemption terminals to
363 allow a player to donate prizes to be paid to a player
364 having a value of less than one dollar to charitable
365 organizations.
366 (2) The maximum wager for a single video lottery game
367 shall not exceed four dollars. The maximum prize won from a
368 single wager for video lottery game play shall be no more
369 than one dollar less than the minimum amount required to
370 report gambling winnings from slot machines pursuant to IRS
371 Form W2G and IRS Form 5754;
372 (3) No more than eight video lottery game terminals
373 may be placed at the business premises of a video lottery
374 game retailer;
375 (4) The play, use, or operation of video lottery games
376 and video lottery game terminals shall not be advertised to
377 the public through any means including, but not limited to,
378 media outlets, social media advertising, direct mail,
379 broadcast media, telephone solicitation, billboards, or
380 other signage. The commission may adopt rules allowing for
381 limited signage to be displayed at a video lottery game
382 retailer's premises. The advertising prohibition contained
383 in this subdivision shall apply to all licensees including,
384 but not limited to, video lottery game manufacturers, video
385 lottery game distributors, video lottery game operators,
386 video lottery game retailers, and video lottery game
387 handlers. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
388 contrary, there is no prohibition or restriction on direct
389 or indirect marketing or advertising of video lottery games,
390 video lottery game terminals, or redemption terminals by
391 video lottery game manufacturers, and video lottery game

SB 862 20
392 distributors to video lottery game operators and video
393 lottery game retailers. Video lottery game operators may
394 advertise, promote, and market to players of video lottery
395 games and video lottery game terminals through player
396 rewards programs approved by the commission.
397 (5) Video lottery games shall not be played at any
398 time when the video lottery game retailer's establishment is
399 closed for business.
400 11. (1) No person under twenty-one years of age shall
401 play video lottery games or video lottery game terminals.
402 The video lottery game retailer shall be responsible for
403 preventing persons under twenty-one years of age from
404 playing video lottery games or video lottery game terminals.
405 (2) Video lottery game operators shall install,
406 maintain, and operate video surveillance systems within the
407 immediate area of the video lottery game retailer's
408 establishment where video lottery game terminals and
409 redemption terminals are located. The surveillance system
410 may also cover the perimeter of the video lottery game
411 retailer's premises. The video lottery game operator shall
412 maintain video footage for thirty days and shall, upon
413 request, provide such footage to the commission. Video
414 footage taken by the video surveillance system shall:
415 (a) Be deleted and expunged after the thirty day
416 period described in this subdivision; and
417 (b) Not make use of any facial recognition technology
418 or software.
419 (3) The commission shall adopt rules regarding the
420 investigation and enforcement of violations of law, rule, or
421 regulation governing the conduct of video lottery games in
422 conformance with established commission procedures, which

SB 862 21
423 may include fines, suspension, and revocation of licenses
424 issued by the commission.
425 (4) A video lottery game operator shall post a sign in
426 a conspicuous location where such video lottery game
427 terminals are located containing, in red lettering at least
428 one-half inch high on a white background, a telephone
429 contact number (1-888-BETSOFF) for the problem gambling
430 helpline, or other similar information as determined by the
431 commission. The commission may adopt rules for the
432 mandatory posting of signage regarding problem gaming,
433 underage gaming, and other consumer protection measures.
434 (5) Pursuant to rules adopted by the department and
435 the commission, a video lottery game operator shall be
436 responsible for:
437 (a) Paying prizes won from video lottery game play to
438 winning players;
439 (b) Collecting all funds from video lottery game
440 terminals;
441 (c) Depositing all funds collected from video lottery
442 game terminals into a separate bank account maintained by
443 the video lottery game operator to allow for monthly
444 electronic fund transfers by the commission and the
445 department all applicable adjusted gross gaming tax and
446 municipality and county administration tax;
447 (d) After such transfer to the commission and the
448 department, remitting to the video lottery game retailer its
449 share of net terminal income on not less than a monthly
450 basis. The video lottery game operator may thereafter
451 transfer its share of net terminal income to its business
452 operations account; and
453 (e) The commission may adopt rules allowing for the
454 division of net terminal income between the video lottery

SB 862 22
455 game operator and the video lottery game retailer on a basis
456 other than an equal division of net terminal income.
457 (6) A video lottery game retailer or operator shall
458 place a conspicuous warning label or sticker on each video
459 lottery game terminal at each video lottery game retailer
460 location in red lettering at least one-half inch high on
461 white background that reads, "WARNING: GAMBLING CAN BE
462 ADDICTIVE".
463 12. The adjusted gross gaming revenue tax shall be
464 imposed on adjusted gross gaming revenue. Video lottery
465 game operators shall collect and remit the adjusted gross
466 gaming revenue tax, which shall be deposited in the state
467 lottery fund pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.
468 The commission shall use and transmit such funds as follows:
469 (1) The commission shall retain an amount from the
470 adjusted gross gaming revenue tax necessary to cover direct
471 administrative expenses for the regulation and enforcement
472 of the video lottery game program that are not covered by
473 license fees or reimbursements;
474 (2) Subject to appropriations, all remaining funds
475 after administrative expenses and payment of prizes shall be
476 transferred to the lottery proceeds fund and shall be
477 appropriated equally to public elementary and secondary
478 education and public institutions of higher education. Ten
479 percent of such funds shall be appropriated to public
480 institutions of higher education workforce development
481 programs, and ten percent of such funds shall be
482 appropriated for construction and rehabilitation of public
483 elementary and secondary education facilities. The funding
484 provided for in this subdivision shall supplement, and not
485 supplant, any education funding otherwise appropriated by
486 the general assembly.

SB 862 23
487 13. The municipality and county administration tax
488 shall be imposed on adjusted gross gaming revenue. Video
489 lottery game operators shall remit the municipality and
490 county administration tax to the department. The department
491 shall distribute such funds to the municipality or county
492 identified by the commission pursuant to subdivision (15) of
493 subsection 2 of this section. The municipality or county
494 shall receive the proceeds of the municipality and county
495 administration tax generated by the video lottery game
496 terminals located within the jurisdiction of the identified
497 municipality or county to be used for providing services
498 necessary for the safety of the public visiting a video
499 lottery game retailer's location. All revenue owed to the
500 municipality or county shall be deposited and distributed to
501 the municipality or county in accordance with rules and
502 regulations created by the department. All the funds
503 deposited with any municipality or county shall not be
504 considered state funds and shall be deposited in the
505 municipality or county's general revenue fund to be expended
506 as provided for in this section.
507 14. All revenues received by the commission from
508 license fees and any reimbursements associated with the
509 administration of the provisions of sections 313.425 to
510 313.445, and all interest earned thereon, shall be used for
511 administrative expenses and shall be deposited in the state
512 lottery fund. Moneys deposited into the state lottery fund
513 from license fees and any reimbursements of commission
514 administrative expenses to administer sections 313.425 to
515 313.445 shall not be considered net proceeds under Article
516 III, Section 39(b) of the Constitution of Missouri. Subject
517 to appropriation, up to one percent of such license fees

SB 862 24
518 shall be deposited to the credit of the compulsive gamblers
519 fund created under section 313.842.
520 15. The commission may contract with a state law
521 enforcement entity to assist in conducting background
522 investigations of video lottery game license applicants, and
523 for the enforcement of sections 313.425 to 313.445.
524 16. The commission shall adopt rules for the
525 implementation of the video lottery game system authorized
526 under sections 313.425 to 313.445, including, but not
527 limited to, a designation of a distinct, designated area
528 within a video lottery game retailer's premises as the video
529 lottery gaming area that is divided from the primary
530 business operation area of the video lottery game retailer's
531 premises where all video lottery game terminals and
532 redemption terminals shall be placed and operated and all
533 gaming activity shall be conducted. Any rule or portion of
534 a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
535 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
536 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
537 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
538 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
539 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
540 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
541 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
542 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
543 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
544 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
313.431. In order to expedite the orderly
implementation of the video lottery game system authorized
under sections 313.425 to 313.445, the commission shall:

SB 862 25
(1) Contract for the supply and operation of a central
control system no later than ninety days after the effective
date of sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(2) Make license applications for video lottery game
manufacturers, video lottery game distributors, video
lottery game operators, video lottery game retailers, and
video lottery game handlers available to applicants no later
than thirty days after the effective date of sections
313.425 to 313.445;
(3) Accept applications and promulgate any emergency
rules or regular rules and regulations needed for the
implementation of the video lottery game system authorized
under sections 313.425 to 313.445 no later than one hundred
twenty days after the effective date of sections 313.425 to
313.445;
(4) Issue an approved form use agreement no later than
ninety days after the effective date of sections 313.425 to
313.445;
(5) Establish a start date when all video lottery game
operators may begin soliciting use agreements with video
lottery game retailers for the placement of video lottery
game terminals. No video lottery game operator shall
solicit use agreements prior to the start date. Such start
date shall be set no more than one hundred eighty days after
the effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.445;
(6) Approve or deny any completed video lottery game
retailer application or video lottery game operator
application no more than ninety days after such application
is received by the commission. The operation of unregulated
amusement devices or unregulated gambling devices shall not
be the sole cause for denial of a video lottery game

SB 862 26
retailer license or a video lottery game operator license;
and
(7) Establish a date by which the system of video
lottery game terminals shall be operational. The
operational date shall be no later than three hundred sixty
five days after the effective date of sections 313.425 to
313.445.
313.433. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, participation by a person, firm, corporation,
or organization in any aspect of the state lottery under
sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall not be construed to be a
lottery or gift enterprise in violation of Article III,
Section 39 of the Constitution of Missouri.
313.435. 1. A municipality may adopt an ordinance
prohibiting video lottery game terminals within the
corporate limits of such municipality within ninety days
after the effective date of this act. Such municipality
shall notify the commission of the ordinance within seven
days of passage. A municipality that has adopted such an
ordinance may at any time thereafter adopt an ordinance
allowing video lottery game terminals within the corporate
limits of such municipality, but may not after the passage
of such ordinance adopt any ordinance prohibiting video
lottery game terminals within the corporate limits of such
municipality.
2. A county commission may, for the unincorporated
area of the county, adopt an ordinance prohibiting video
lottery game terminals within the unincorporated area of the
county within ninety days from the effective date of this
act. Such county shall notify the commission of the
ordinance within seven days of passage. A county commission
that has adopted such an ordinance may at any time

SB 862 27
thereafter adopt an ordinance allowing video lottery game
terminals within the unincorporated area of the county, but
may not after the passage of such ordinance adopt any
ordinance prohibiting video lottery game terminals within
the unincorporated area of the county.
3. Any municipality or county adopting an ordinance
that prohibits the licensing of video lottery games shall
notify the commission of such action and provide a certified
copy of such ordinance to the commission. Upon receiving
such notification and ordinance, the commission shall not
license video lottery game retailers within such area
covered by such municipal or county ordinance.
4. If any such municipality or county that has opted
to prohibit the use of video lottery game terminals to play
video lottery games repeals such ordinance and adopts an
ordinance allowing video lottery game terminals within such
municipality or county, then such municipality or county
shall notify the commission, and the commission may license
video lottery game retailers within such municipality or
county to conduct video lottery games.
313.437. 1. Nothing in sections 313.425 to 313.445
shall be construed to prohibit or bar the issuance of any
license described therein to an applicant on the basis of
that applicant's operation, handling, leasing, licensing,
servicing, or placing of machines or devices used for
amusement purposes, except that any video lottery game
retailer shall attest, on a form provided by the commission,
that the video lottery game retailer does not own or possess
any illegal gambling devices, or other machines or devices
where the player pays money to play a game of skill or
chance which may result in a cash award or prize to the
player. This form shall be submitted with a person's

SB 862 28
application for any license authorized under sections
313.425 to 313.445.
2. The general assembly, by enacting sections 313.425
to 313.445, intends to enact a comprehensive scheme of
statewide regulation, and further intends to preempt any
other regulation of the area covered by sections 313.425 to
313.445. No municipality, county, governmental subdivision,
or agency may enact or enforce any law, ordinance, or
regulation that regulates, taxes, imposes a fee, or makes
any conduct in the area covered by sections 313.425 to
313.445 an offense, or the subject of a criminal or civil
penalty or sanction of any kind.
313.438. 1. The application form for licensure under
sections 313.425 to 313.445 shall be prescribed by the
commission and shall contain the following information:
(1) The name, date of birth, and address of the
individual or organization;
(2) A statement as to whether the individual or
organization has had any previous application refused, or
any license revoked or suspended;
(3) A copy of the articles of incorporation and
certificate of incorporation of the organization, if
applicable;
(4) A sworn statement signed by the individual or
chief officer and the secretary of the organization
verifying that the statements contained in the application
are true;
(5) The name and address of a person authorized to
receive service of process on behalf of the organization; and
(6) Such other information deemed necessary by the
commission or as the commission may promulgate by
regulation.

SB 862 29
2. The commission shall issue, suspend, revoke, and
renew licenses under sections 313.425 to 313.445 pursuant to
rules and regulations adopted by the commission. Licensing
rules and regulations shall include requirements relating to
the financial responsibility of the licensee, the
accessibility of the licensee's place of business or
activity to the public, the sufficiency of existing licenses
to serve the public interest, the volume of expected sales,
the security and efficient operation of the video lottery
game, and other matters necessary to protect the public
interest and trust in the lottery. Licensees shall be
selected without regard to political affiliation.
3. The commission shall require every licensee to post
a bond, a bonding fee, or a letter of credit in such amount
as may be required by the commission, and upon licensure
shall prominently display the licensee's license, or a copy
thereof, as provided in the rules and regulations of the
commission.
4. Any license issued by the commission shall not be
assignable or transferable.
5. A license shall be revoked upon a finding that the
licensee:
(1) Has knowingly provided false or misleading
information to the commission or its employees;
(2) Has been convicted of any felony; or
(3) Has endangered the security of the lottery.
6. A license may be suspended, revoked, or not renewed
for any of the following causes:
(1) A change of business location;
(2) An insufficient sales volume;
(3) A delinquency in remitting money owed to the
commission; or

SB 862 30
(4) Any violation of any rule or regulation adopted
pursuant to this section by the commission.
7. A person who knowingly makes a false statement on
an application is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall
not be eligible for any license by the commission.
8. A renewal application shall only include any
changes in the information required to be submitted with the
initial application or such other information required by
the commission.
(1) A blank form for application for registration
shall be mailed to each person licensed in this state at the
person's last known office or residence address. Failure to
receive such application shall not, however, relieve any
person of the duty to renew and pay the required fee, nor
exempt the person from the penalties provided by this
chapter for failure to renew.
(2) If a person licensed, certified, or registered by
the commission does not renew such license, such license
shall be deemed void.
9. The commission shall submit fingerprints for any
person seeking issuance or renewal of a license issued by
the commission, for the purpose of checking the person's
prior criminal history when the commission determines a
nationwide check is warranted. The fingerprint cards and
any required fees shall be sent to the Missouri state
highway patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall
be used for searching the state criminal history repository
and shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for the searching of the federal criminal
history files under section 43.540. The patrol shall notify
the commission of any criminal history information or lack
of criminal history information discovered on the

SB 862 31
individual. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
610.120 to the contrary, all records related to any criminal
history information discovered shall be accessible and
available to the commission.
10. It is the burden of the applicant to show by clear
and convincing evidence the applicant's suitability as to
character, experience, and other factors as may be deemed
appropriate by the commission.
11. Before a license is granted, the commission shall
conduct a thorough investigation of the applicant for a
license. The applicant shall provide information on a form
as required by the commission.
12. Any organization licensed under sections 313.425
to 313.445 that changes any of its officers, directors, or
officials during the term of the license shall immediately
100 report the names and addresses of such individuals to the
101 commission, along with a sworn statement of each such
102 individual as required on forms furnished by the commission.
103 13. The following persons and organizations shall not
104 be eligible for any license under the provisions of sections
105 313.425 to 313.445 and shall not participate in the
106 management, conduct, or operation of any video lottery game,
107 video lottery game handler, video lottery game distributor,
108 or video lottery game manufacturer:
109 (1) Any person who has been convicted of a felony;
110 (2) Any person who has been convicted of or pleaded
111 nolo contendere to any illegal gambling activity or
112 forfeited bond for not appearing while charged with any
113 illegal gambling activity;
114 (3) Any person the commission has determined, based on
115 the person's prior activities or criminal record, if any,
116 poses a threat to the public interest or to the effective

SB 862 32
117 regulation and control of video lottery games, or creates or
118 enhances the dangers of unsuitable, unfair, or illegal
119 practices, methods, or activities in the conduct of video
120 lottery games;
121 (4) Any firm, organization, or corporation in which a
122 person defined in subdivision (3) of this subsection is an
123 officer, director, or employee, whether compensated or not;
124 (5) Any firm, organization, or corporation in which a
125 person defined in subdivision (3) of this subsection is to
126 participate in the management or operations of a video
127 lottery game, video lottery game handler, video lottery game
128 distributor, video lottery game manufacturer, or video
129 lottery game retailer;
130 (6) Any person who, at the time of the application for
131 renewal of a license, would not be eligible for such license
132 upon first application.
313.439. 1. A licensee shall be subject to the
imposition of penalties, suspension or revocation of such
license, or other action for any act or failure to act by
the licensee or the licensee's agents or employees, that is
injurious to the public health, safety, good order, and
general welfare of the people of the state of Missouri, or
that would discredit or tend to discredit the video lottery
operations in the state of Missouri unless the licensee
proves by clear and convincing evidence that the licensee is
not guilty of such action. The commission may refuse to
issue a license. The commission shall notify the applicant
or licensee in writing of the reasons for the refusal or
discipline, and shall advise the applicant or licensee of
their right to file a complaint with the administrative
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621. If no
written request for a hearing is received by the

SB 862 33
administrative hearing commission within the thirty-day
period, the right to seek review of the commission's
decision shall be considered as waived. The commission
shall take appropriate action against any applicant or
licensee who violates the law or the rules and regulations
of the commission. Without limiting other provisions of
sections 313.425 to 313.445, the following acts or omissions
may be grounds for such discipline:
(1) Failing to comply with or make provision for
compliance with the provisions of sections 313.425 to
313.445, the rules and regulations of the commission, or any
federal, state, or local law or regulation;
(2) Failing to comply with any rule, order, or ruling
of the commission or its agents pertaining to sections
313.425 to 313.445;
(3) Receiving or purchasing goods or services from a
person or business entity who does not hold a license issued
pursuant to sections 313.425 to 313.445, but who is required
to hold such license by the provisions of sections 313.425
to 313.445 or the rules and regulations of the commission;
(4) Associating with, either socially or in business
affairs, or employing persons of notorious or unsavory
reputation or who have extensive police records, or who have
failed to cooperate with any officially constituted
investigatory or administrative body and would adversely
affect public confidence and trust in gaming;
(5) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or
bribery in securing any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445 or impersonation
of any person holding a license or allowing a person to use
the person's license;

SB 862 34
(6) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
or other compensation by fraud, deception, or
misrepresentation;
(7) Incompetence, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud,
misrepresentation, or dishonesty in the performance of the
functions or duties regulated by the provisions of sections
313.425 to 313.445;
(8) Revocation, suspension, restriction, modification,
limitation, reprimand, warning, censure, probation, or other
final disciplinary action against the licensee or applicant
for a license by another state, territory, federal agency,
or country, whether or not voluntarily agreed to by the
licensee or applicant, including, but not limited to, the
denial of licensure, surrender of the license, or allowing
the license to expire or lapse;
(9) A person is finally adjudged incapacitated or
disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(10) Issuance of a license based upon a material
mistake of fact;
(11) Knowingly making a false statement, orally or in
writing, to the commission;
2. The commission may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission as provided by
chapter 621 against any applicant or holder of any license
required by sections 313.425 to 313.445, or against any
person who has failed to renew or has surrendered the
person's license.
3. After the filing of such complaint before the
administrative hearing commission, the proceedings shall be
conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621.
Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission that
the grounds of this section for disciplinary action are met,

SB 862 35
the commission may, singly or in combination, warn, censure,
or place the person named in the complaint on probation on
such terms and conditions as the commission deems
appropriate for a period not to exceed ten years, or may
suspend the person's license for a period not to exceed
three years, or restrict or limit the person's license for
an indefinite period of time, or revoke the person's license
or administer a public or private reprimand, or deny the
person's application for a license, or permanently withhold
issuance of a license.
313.440. The administration of sections 313.425 to
313.445 shall be vested in the commission which shall have
power to adopt and enforce rules and regulations to regulate
and license the management, operation, and conduct of video
lottery games and participants therein and to properly
administer and enforce the provisions of sections 313.425 to
313.445. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
313.441. The commission shall employ such
professional, clerical, technical, and administrative
personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of
sections 313.425 to 313.445. No person shall be employed by

SB 862 36
the lottery who has been convicted of a felony. Any person
employed by the lottery in a management or policy-making
position shall be a resident of this state or become a
Missouri resident within six months of the person's
appointment. Personnel shall be employed without regard to
any political affiliation. Personnel shall receive a salary
comparable to the salaries received by other state employees
doing comparable duties.
313.442. 1. The commission may administer oaths,
subpoena witnesses, issue subpoenas duces tecum, and require
production of documents and records. Subpoenas, including
subpoenas duces tecum, shall be served by a person
authorized to serve subpoenas of courts of record. In lieu
of requiring attendance of a person to produce original
documents in response to a subpoena duces tecum, the
commission may require sworn copies of such documents to be
filed with it or delivered to its designated representative.
2. The commission may enforce its subpoenas, including
subpoena duces tecum, by applying to a circuit court of Cole
County, the county of the investigation, hearing or
proceeding, or any county where the person resides or may be
found, for an order upon any person who shall fail to obey a
subpoena to show cause why such subpoena should not be
enforced, which such order and a copy of the application
therefore shall be served upon the person in the same manner
as a summons in a civil action, and if the circuit court
shall, after a hearing, determine that the subpoena should
be sustained and enforced, such court shall proceed to
enforce the subpoena in the same manner as though the
subpoena had been issued in a civil case in the circuit
court.

SB 862 37
313.443. Upon application by the commission, and the
necessary burden having been met, a court of general
jurisdiction may grant an injunction, restraining order, or
other order as may be appropriate to enjoin a person from
offering to engage or engaging in the performance of any
acts or practices for which a license is required by
sections 313.425 to 313.445 upon a showing that such acts or
practices were performed or offered to be performed without
a license. Any such action shall be commenced either in the
county in which such conduct occurred or in the county in
which the defendant resides. Any action brought under this
section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any
penalty provided by sections 313.425 to 313.445 and may be
brought concurrently with other actions to enforce the
provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445.
313.444. Upon receiving information that any provision
of sections 313.425 to 313.445 has been or is being
violated, the commission or other person designated by the
commission shall investigate, and upon probable cause
appearing, the commission shall file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission or appropriate official or
court.
313.445. The provisions of sections 313.425 to 313.445
are severable. If any provision of sections 313.425 to
313.445 is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
unconstitutional, the remaining provisions are valid except
to the extent that the court finds that the valid
provisions, standing alone, are incomplete and are incapable
of being executed in accordance with the legislative
intent. The provisions of this section shall be operative
notwithstanding the provisions of section 1.140 to the
contrary.

SB 862 38
313.820. 1. An excursion boat licensee shall pay to
the commission an admission fee of [two] four dollars for
each person embarking on an excursion gambling boat with a
ticket of admission. One dollar of such fee shall be
deposited to the credit of the gaming commission fund as
authorized pursuant to section 313.835, two dollars of such
fee shall be transferred to the Missouri veterans commission
as established under section 42.007, and one dollar of such
fee shall not be considered state funds and shall be paid to
the home dock city or county. Subject to appropriation, one
cent of such fee deposited to the credit of the gaming
commission fund may be deposited to the credit of the
compulsive gamblers fund created pursuant to the provisions
of section 313.842. Nothing in this section shall preclude
any licensee from charging any amount deemed necessary for a
ticket of admission to any person embarking on an excursion
gambling boat. If tickets are issued which are good for
more than one excursion, the admission fee shall be paid to
the commission for each person using the ticket on each
excursion that the ticket is used. If free passes or
complimentary admission tickets are issued, the excursion
boat licensee shall pay to the commission the same fee upon
these passes or complimentary tickets as if they were sold
at the regular and usual admission rate; however, the
excursion boat licensee may issue fee-free passes to actual
and necessary officials and employees of the licensee or
other persons actually working on the excursion gambling
boat. The issuance of fee-free passes is subject to the
rules of the commission, and a list of all persons to whom
the fee-free passes are issued shall be filed with the
commission.

SB 862 39
2. All licensees are subject to all income taxes,
sales taxes, earnings taxes, use taxes, property taxes or
any other tax or fee now or hereafter lawfully levied by any
political subdivision; however, no other license tax, permit
tax, occupation tax, excursion fee, or taxes or fees shall
be imposed, levied or assessed exclusively upon licensees by
a political subdivision. All state taxes not connected
directly to gambling games shall be collected by the
department of revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 32.057 to the contrary, the department of revenue
may furnish and the commission may receive tax information
to determine if applicants or licensees are complying with
the tax laws of this state; however, any tax information
acquired by the commission shall not become public record
and shall be used exclusively for commission business.
572.010. As used in this chapter the following terms
mean:
(1) "Advance gambling activity", a person advances
gambling activity if, acting other than as a player, he or
she engages in conduct that materially aids any form of
gambling activity. Conduct of this nature includes but is
not limited to conduct directed toward the creation or
establishment of the particular game, lottery, contest,
scheme, gambling, device or activity involved, toward the
acquisition or maintenance of premises, paraphernalia,
equipment or apparatus therefor, toward the solicitation or
inducement of persons to participate therein, toward the
actual conduct of the playing phases thereof, toward the
arrangement or communication of any of its financial or
recording phases, or toward any other phase of its
operation. A person advances gambling activity if, having
substantial proprietary control or other authoritative

SB 862 40
control over premises being used with his or her knowledge
for purposes of gambling activity, he or she permits that
activity to occur or continue or makes no effort to prevent
its occurrence or continuation. The supplying, servicing
and operation of a licensed excursion gambling boat under
sections 313.800 to 313.840 does not constitute advancing
gambling activity. The owning, operating, supplying, or
servicing of video lottery game terminals under sections
313.425 to 313.437 does not constitute advancing gambling
activity;
(2) "Bookmaking", advancing gambling activity by
unlawfully accepting bets from members of the public as a
business, rather than in a casual or personal fashion, upon
the outcomes of future contingent events;
(3) "Contest of chance", any contest, game, gaming
scheme, or [gaming] gambling device in which the outcome
[depends in a material degree upon an] of the contest is
determined by any element of chance, notwithstanding that
the skill of the contestants may also be a factor therein;
(4) "Gambling", a person engages in gambling when:
(a) He or she operates, plays, or participates in the
operation of a gambling device; or
(b) He or she stakes or risks something of value upon
the outcome of a contest of chance or a future contingent
event not under his or her control or influence, upon an
agreement or understanding that he or she will receive
something of value in the event of a certain outcome.
Gambling does not include bona fide business transactions
valid under the law of contracts, including but not limited
to contracts for the purchase or sale at a future date of
securities or commodities, and agreements to compensate for
loss caused by the happening of chance, including but not

SB 862 41
limited to contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life,
health or accident insurance; nor does gambling include
playing an amusement device that confers only an immediate
right of replay not exchangeable for something of value.
Gambling does not include any licensed activity, or persons
participating in such games which are covered by sections
313.800 to 313.840. Gambling does not include any licensed
activity or persons participating in such licensed activity,
licensed video lottery game terminals, or video lottery
games under sections 313.425 to 313.437;
(5) ["Gambling device", any device, machine,
paraphernalia or equipment that is used or usable in the
playing phases of any gambling activity, whether that
activity consists of gambling between persons or gambling by
a person with a machine. However, lottery tickets, policy
slips and other items used in the playing phases of lottery
and policy schemes are not gambling devices within this
definition;
(6)] "Gambling record", any article, instrument,
record, receipt, ticket, certificate, token, slip or
notation used or intended to be used in connection with
unlawful gambling activity;
[(7)] (6) "Lottery" or "policy", an unlawful gambling
scheme in which for a consideration the participants are
given an opportunity to win something of value, the award of
which is determined by chance;
[(8)] (7) "Player", a person who engages in any form
of gambling solely as a contestant or bettor, without
receiving or becoming entitled to receive any profit
therefrom other than personal gambling winnings, and without
otherwise rendering any material assistance to the
establishment, conduct or operation of the particular

SB 862 42
gambling activity. A person who gambles at a social game of
chance on equal terms with the other participants therein
does not otherwise render material assistance to the
establishment, conduct or operation thereof by performing,
without fee or remuneration, acts directed toward the
arrangement or facilitation of the game, such as inviting
persons to play, permitting the use of premises therefor and
supplying cards or other equipment used therein. A person
who engages in "bookmaking" as defined in subdivision (2) of
this section is not a player;
[(9)] (8) "Professional player", a player who engages
in gambling for a livelihood or who has derived at least
twenty percent of his or her income in any one year within
the past five years from acting solely as a player;
[(10)] (9) "Profit from gambling activity", a person
profits from gambling activity if, other than as a player,
he or she accepts or receives money or other property
pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person
100 whereby he participates or is to participate in the proceeds
101 of gambling activity;
102 [(11)] (10) "Slot machine"[, a gambling device that as
103 a result of the insertion of a coin or other object
104 operates, either completely automatically or with the aid of
105 some physical act by the player, in such a manner that,
106 depending upon elements of chance, it may eject something of
107 value. A device so constructed or readily adaptable or
108 convertible to such use is no less a slot machine because it
109 is not in working order or because some mechanical act of
110 manipulation or repair is required to accomplish its
111 adaptation, conversion or workability. Nor is it any less a
112 slot machine because apart from its use or adaptability as
113 such it may also sell or deliver something of value on a

SB 862 43
114 basis other than chance] or "gambling device", an
115 electronic, computerized, or mechanical machine, terminal,
116 or other similar device that:
117 (a) Requires the direct or indirect insertion of any
118 form of consideration, coin, currency, ticket, token,
119 electronic token or currency, or other similar object, or
120 the depositing of any form of consideration with the owner
121 or operator of such slot machine or gambling device to
122 operate the device;
123 (b) Offers, operates, or plays a contest or game,
124 either completely automatically or with the aid of some
125 physical act by the player, the outcome of which is
126 determined by any element of chance, regardless of whether
127 the outcome may also be partially or predominantly
128 determined by the skill of the player, and regardless of
129 whether the outcome may be partially or completely revealed
130 to the player before or during play of the slot machine or
131 gambling device; and
132 (c) May award to the player an award, prize, or
133 something of value, whether or not the award is made
134 directly or indirectly, and whether or not the award is made
135 automatically from the gambling device or manually.
136 A device so constructed or readily adaptable or convertible
137 to such use is no less a slot machine or gambling device
138 because it is not in working order or because some
139 mechanical act of manipulation or repair is required to
140 accomplish its adaptation, conversion, or workability, nor
141 is it any less a slot machine or gambling device because
142 apart from its use or adaptability as such it may also sell
143 or deliver something of value on a basis other than chance;

SB 862 44
144 [(12)] (11) "Something of value", any money or
145 property, any token, object or article exchangeable for
146 money or property, or any form of credit or promise directly
147 or indirectly contemplating transfer of money or property or
148 of any interest therein or involving extension of a service,
149 entertainment or a privilege of playing at a game or scheme
150 without charge;
151 [(13)] (12) "Unlawful", not specifically authorized by
152 law.
572.020. 1. A person commits the offense of gambling
if he or she knowingly engages in gambling.
2. The offense of gambling is a class [C misdemeanor
unless:
(1) It is committed by a professional player, in which
case it is a class A misdemeanor; or
(2) The person knowingly engages in gambling with a
child less than seventeen years of age, in which case it is
a class B misdemeanor] E felony.
572.070. 1. A person commits the offense of
possession of a gambling device if, with knowledge of the
character thereof, he or she manufactures, sells,
transports, places or possesses, or conducts or negotiates
any transaction affecting or designed to affect ownership,
custody or use of:
(1) A slot machine or gambling device; or
(2) Any other gambling device, knowing or having
reason to believe that it is to be used in the state of
Missouri in the advancement of unlawful gambling activity.
2. The offense of possession of a gambling device is a
class A misdemeanor.
572.100. 1. The general assembly by enacting this
chapter intends to preempt any other regulation of the area

SB 862 45
covered by this chapter. No governmental subdivision or
agency may enact or enforce a law that regulates or makes
any conduct in the area covered by this chapter an offense,
or the subject of a criminal or civil penalty or sanction of
any kind.
2. The term "gambling", as used in this chapter, does
not include licensed activities under sections 313.800 to
313.840, and does not include licensed activities under
sections 313.425 to 313.437.
3. The Missouri lottery commission shall have
concurrent authority and jurisdiction to investigate and
enforce violations of chapter 572, and to seek prosecution
of violations of chapter 572 by the attorney general
pursuant to section 27.105.
650.930. 1. There is hereby established within the
department of public safety the "Missouri Gaming Bureau".
The Missouri gaming commission and the Missouri lottery
commission may contract with the Missouri gaming bureau for
assistance in criminal and regulatory investigations
involving individuals, companies, and suppliers who are
applying for licensure or who are conducting any activities
under sections 313.800 to 313.850 or operations relating to
video lottery games.
2. The director of the gaming bureau shall be a
uniformed member of the Missouri state highway patrol who
shall be appointed by the superintendent of the state
highway patrol. The director shall be responsible for the
administrative operations of the gaming bureau and shall
perform such other duties as may be delegated or assigned to
the director by the department of public safety. Members of
the state highway patrol, pursuant to a memorandum of
understanding with the state highway patrol, may provide

SB 862 46
services to the gaming bureau. The director may employ
additional members to serve in the gaming bureau, provided
that such persons are licensed peace officers under chapter
590 and have a minimum of six hundred hours of law
enforcement training.
3. Members of the gaming bureau shall have full power
and authority as are now or hereafter vested by law in peace
officers when working with the bureau, which shall include
the power to enforce the rules of the gaming commission with
respect to the gaming and lottery industry and the power to
investigate violations occurring on the gaming floor and
premises of excursion gambling boats licensed under sections
313.800 to 313.850, violations by licensees of the lottery
commission, and violations of chapter 572.
4. Members of the gaming bureau shall be paid from
funds designated as administrative within the state lottery
fund established under section 313.321 that were generated
from revenues received by the Missouri lottery commission
from the sale of Missouri lottery tickets and from license
fees and reimbursements associated with the regulation and
operation of video lottery games in the state and from funds
designated as administrative within the gaming commission
fund established under section 313.835 that were generated
from revenues received by the Missouri gaming commission
from license fees and reimbursements associated with the
regulation and operation of excursion gambling boats in the
state.
5. The director of the department of public safety may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall

SB 862 47
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓